dev/verbs.dix
  <!-- atgādināt; atgādin -->
    <pardef n="atgādin/āt__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>āšu</l>
          <r>āt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>āsim</l>
          <r>āt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>āsi</l>
          <r>āt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>āsiet</l>
          <r>āt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>āsit</l>
          <r>āt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ās</l>
          <r>āt<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>āt</l>
          <r>āt<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>āju</l>
          <r>āt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ājām</l>
          <r>āt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>āji</l>
          <r>āt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ājāt</l>
          <r>āt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>āja</l>
          <r>āt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>āt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ām</l>
          <r>āt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>āt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>āt</l>
          <r>āt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>āt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- stādīties; stād -->
    <pardef n="stād/īties__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īšos</l>
          <r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īsimies</l>
          <r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īsies</l>
          <r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īsities</l>
          <r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īsieties</l>
          <r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īsies</l>
          <r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īties</l>
          <r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ījos</l>
          <r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ījāmies</l>
          <r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ījies</l>
          <r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ījāties</l>
          <r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ījās</l>
          <r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>āmies</l>
          <r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ies</l>
          <r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>āties</l>
          <r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ās</l>
          <r>īties<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ierunāties; ierunā -->
    <pardef n="ierunā/ties__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šos</l>
          <r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>simies</l>
          <r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sies</l>
          <r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sities</l>
          <r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sieties</l>
          <r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sies</l>
          <r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ties</l>
          <r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jos</l>
          <r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jāmies</l>
          <r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jies</l>
          <r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jāties</l>
          <r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jās</l>
          <r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jos</l>
          <r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jamies</l>
          <r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jies</l>
          <r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jaties</l>
          <r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jas</l>
          <r>ties<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="atgādināt"><i>atgādin</i><par n="atgādin/āt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="stādīties"><i>stād</i><par n="stād/īties__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ierunāties"><i>ierunā</i><par n="ierunā/ties__vblex"/></e>
